Utah statutes.
76-6-202.   Burglary.

(1)  An actor is guilty of burglary if he enters or remains unlawfully in a building or any portion of a building with intent to commit:

(a)  a felony;

(b)  theft;

(c)  an assault on any person;

(d)  lewdness, a violation of Subsection 76-9-702(1);

(e)  sexual battery, a violation of Subsection 76-9-702(3);

(f)  lewdness involving a child, in violation of Section 76-9-702.5; or

(g)  voyeurism against a child under Subsection 76-9-702.7(2) or (5).

(2)  Burglary is a felony of the third degree unless it was committed in a dwelling, in which event it is a felony of the second degree.

(3)  A violation of this section is a separate offense from any of the offenses listed in Subsections (1)(a) through (g), and which may be committed by the actor while he is in the building.

